Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3810
Corporation; contracts authorized; requirements.

A prepaid dental service corporation may contract with others, including insurance companies organized under any of the laws of the State of Nebraska, for partial or total administrative services or for joint participation or otherwise cede to or accept from others the whole or any part of the corporation's dental service obligations. Such contracts shall be filed with and approved by the director as being in accordance with the plan of the corporation prior to their effectiveness. The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations concerning such contracts.

Laws 1982, LB 139, § 10;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 241.